South Dakota, session 2026, HB1192.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That § 24-15-4 be AMENDED:
24-15-4. No inmate sentenced to life imprisonment is eligible for parole by the
Board of Pardons and Paroles, except as provided in §§ 24-15A-55 to 24-15A-68,
inclusive, and section 2 of this Act.
Section 2. That chapter 24-15A be amended with a NEW SECTION:
An inmate sentenced to life imprisonment for an offense, other than rape in the
first degree pursuant to § 22-22-1, which was committed when the inmate was at least
eighteen years old but under the age of twenty-seven is eligible for discretionary parole
consideration when the inmate has served twenty-five years. The board shall conduct an
initial discretionary parole hearing within six months of the inmate achieving eligibility.
The board must consider the factors set forth in section 3 of this Act in determining
whether to grant parole under this section.
If an inmate considered for discretionary parole under this section is denied parole,
the board must establish a discretionary parole date of not less than five years from the
date of denial. Subsequent discretionary parole hearings must be held at intervals of not
more than two years.
An inmate granted parole under this section is otherwise subject to the provisions
of chapters 24-13, 24-15, and 24-15A.
The provisions of this Act apply retroactively to any inmate sentenced before July
1, 2026.
Section 3. That chapter 24-15A be amended with a NEW SECTION:
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.220.17 2 1192
In determining whether to grant parole under section 2 of this Act, the board shall
consider:
(1) The inmate's age at the time of the offense, the diminished culpability of youth,
and the immaturity, impetuosity, and failure to appreciate risks and consequences
associated with being a youth;
(2) The history and characteristics of the inmate;
(3) The inmate's family and community circumstances at the time of the offense, and
any history of abuse, trauma, or involvement of the inmate in the child welfare
system;
(4) The nature and circumstances of the offense and the extent of the inmate's role in
the offense;
(5) Whether the inmate has substantially complied with the rules of the institution to
which the inmate is confined;
(6) Whether the inmate has completed any educational, vocational, or other programs
of the institution, where available, in addition to any mandatory educational,
vocational, and work requirements;
(7) Whether the inmate has completed any behavioral or mental health treatment
while incarcerated, if the inmate's behavioral and mental health is determined to
have played a role in the commission of the offense;
(8) Any report or recommendation received from the state's attorney in the county in
which the inmate's conviction was entered;
(9) Whether the inmate has demonstrated maturity, rehabilitation, and a fitness to
reenter society;
(10) Any statement provided by a victim of the offense;
(11) Any report of a physical, mental, or psychiatric examination of the inmate
conducted by a licensed health care professional; and
(12) Any other information the board deems relevant to its decision.
For the purposes of this section, "victim" has the same meaning as in S.D. Const.,
Art. VI, § 29.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.